Arkansas, session 2025, HB1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-7-907(e)(2)(C), concerning payments for
corrective action under the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(C)(i) Interim payments shall consist of payment of an
amount not to exceed ninety percent (90%) of one million five hundred
thousand dollars ($1,500,000) two million dollars ($2,000,000).
(ii) The remaining ten percent (10%) shall be
released only upon final payment for corrective action concerning the
occurrence.







*JMB253*
01/29/2025 11:37:29 AM JMB253